Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2408
Owner or driver; given written statement
by tower; contents.

The owner or driver of any vehicle towed away pursuant
to sections 60-2401 to 60-2411 shall, upon regaining possession of the vehicle from the tower,
be given a written statement by the tower fully detailing: (1) The name and
address of the person or persons who caused the vehicle to be towed; (2) under
what statutory authority the vehicle was towed; and (3) his or her rights
under sections 60-2401 to 60-2411.

Laws 1979, LB 348, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB1065, § 8.